District of Columbia statutes.
4-637

Disposition of fines and penalties.

Fines and penalties collected pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the Healthy DC and Health Care Expansion Fund, established by § 31-3514.02.

Aug. 16, 2008, D.C. Law 17-219, § 5047, 55 DCR 7598
Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 5025(b), 57 DCR 6242
D.C. Law 18-223 substituted “Healthy DC and Health Care Expansion Fund” for “Healthy DC Fund”.
Section 5(b) of D.C. Law 18-205 substituted “Healthy DC and Health Care Expansion Fund” for “Healthy DC Fund”.
Section 7(b) of D.C. Law 18-205 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 5(b) of Medicaid Resource Maximization Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-390, May 7, 2010, 57 DCR 4339).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 5025(b) of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).